Tennessee, session 114, SB1695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-393, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(i) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of food
and food ingredients, as defined in § 67-6-102, if sold between 12:01 a.m. and 11:59
p.m. on the fifth day of any month. This subsection (i) does not exempt sales from a
micro market, as defined in § 67-6-102, or vending machine or device.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1695
009855
- 1 -